Nevada, session 83, AB243.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 361 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A bona fide resident of the State of Nevada who is a
Nevada Gold Star Spouse, and who has not remarried, is entitled
to an exemption not to exceed the amount of $20,000 assessed
valuation. For the purposes of this section, the first $20,000
assessed valuation of property in which a person has any interest
is deemed to be the property of the person.
2. The exemption may be allowed only to a claimant who has
filed an affidavit with his or her claim for exemption on real
property pursuant to NRS 361.155. The affidavit may be made at
any time by a person claiming an exemption from taxation on
personal property.
3. The affidavit required by subsection 2 must be made before
the county assessor or a notary public and be filed with the county
assessor. It must state that the affiant:
(a) Is a bona fide resident of the State of Nevada;
(b) Is a Nevada Gold Star Spouse;
(c) Has not remarried; and
(d) Has not claimed the exemption in any other county within
this State.
-
*AB243_R2*

– 3 –
4. After the filing of the original affidavit required by
subsection 2, the county assessor shall, except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, mail a form for:
(a) The renewal of the exemption; and
(b) The designation of any amount to be credited to the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145,
 to the person each year following a year in which the exemption
was allowed for that person. The form must be designed to
facilitate its return by mail by the person claiming the exemption.
If so requested by the person claiming the exemption, the county
assessor may provide the form to the person by electronic means
in lieu of by mail. The county assessor may authorize the return of
the form by electronic means in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 719 of NRS.
5. Before allowing any exemption pursuant to the provisions
of this section, the county assessor shall require proof that the
person is a Nevada Gold Star Spouse. For this purpose, the county
assessor shall require the person to produce:
(a) A DD Form 1300, “Report of Casualty,” or its succeeding
form, issued by the United States Department of Defense that
identifies the member of the Armed Forces to whom the person
was married and indicates that the member:
(1) Died under any of the circumstances described in 10
U.S.C. § 1126(a); and
(2) Listed Nevada as his or her home of record; and
(b) Documentation that the person was married to the member.
6. The allowance of a tax exemption to a person under this
section does not affect the eligibility of that person for an
exemption under NRS 361.090 or 361.091 based on the person’s
own service in the Armed Forces of the United States, if
applicable.
7. If any person files a false affidavit or produces false proof
to the county assessor or a notary public and, as a result of the
false affidavit or false proof, the person is allowed a tax exemption
to which the person is not entitled, the person is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
8. The monetary amounts in subsection 1 must be adjusted
for each fiscal year by adding to the amount the product of the
amount multiplied by the percentage increase in the consumer
price inflation index from July 2003 to the July preceding the
fiscal year for which the adjustment is calculated. The Department
shall provide to each county assessor the adjusted amount, in
writing, on or before September 30 of each year.
-
*AB243_R2*

– 4 –
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Consumer price inflation index” means the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as
published by the United States Department of Labor or, if that
index ceases to be published by the United States Department of
Labor, the published index selected by the Department of Taxation
pursuant to subsection 11 of NRS 361.091.
(b) “Nevada Gold Star Spouse” means the surviving spouse of
a member of the Armed Forces of the United States who:
(1) Died under any of the circumstances described in 10
U.S.C. § 1126(a); and
(2) At the time of his or her death was a resident of this
State.
(c) “Surviving spouse” includes a surviving domestic partner
as set forth in NRS 122A.200.
Sec. 2. NRS 361.0905 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.0905 1. Any person who qualifies for an exemption
pursuant to NRS 361.090 or 361.091 or section 1 of this act may, in
lieu of claiming the exemption:
(a) Pay to the county tax receiver all or any portion of the
amount by which the tax would be reduced if the person claimed the
exemption; and
(b) Direct the county tax receiver to deposit that amount for
credit to the Gift Account for the Veterans Home in Southern
Nevada or the Gift Account for the Veterans Home in Northern
Nevada established pursuant to NRS 417.145.
2. Any person who wishes to waive his or her exemption
pursuant to this section shall designate the amount to be credited to
a Gift Account on a form provided by the Nevada Tax Commission.
3. The county tax receiver shall deposit any money received
pursuant to this section with the State Treasurer for credit to the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145. The State Treasurer shall not accept more
than a total of $2,000,000 for credit to a Gift Account pursuant to
this section and NRS 371.1035 during any fiscal year.
Sec. 3. NRS 361.1565 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.1565 1. The personal property tax exemption to which a
surviving spouse, person who is blind, veteran , [or] surviving
spouse of a veteran who incurred a service-connected disability or
Nevada Gold Star Spouse is entitled pursuant to NRS 361.080,
361.085, 361.090 or 361.091 or section 1 of this act is reduced to
the extent that he or she is allowed an exemption from the
governmental services tax pursuant to chapter 371 of NRS.
-
*AB243_R2*

– 5 –
2. As used in this section, “Nevada Gold Star Spouse” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 4. Chapter 371 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A bona fide resident of the State of Nevada who is a
Nevada Gold Star Spouse, and who has not remarried, is entitled
to an exemption from the payment of governmental services taxes
on vehicles not to exceed the amount of $20,000 of determined
valuation. For the purpose of this section, the first $20,000 of
determined valuation of vehicles in which a person described in
this subsection has any interest shall be deemed to belong entirely
to that person.
2. A person claiming the exemption shall file annually with
the Department in the county where the exemption is claimed an
affidavit that declares that the person:
(a) Is a bona fide resident of the State of Nevada;
(b) Is a Nevada Gold Star Spouse;
(c) Has not remarried; and
(d) Has not claimed the exemption in any other county within
this State.
3. After the filing of the original affidavit required by
subsection 2, the county assessor in the county where the
exemption is claimed shall, except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, mail a form for:
(a) The renewal of the exemption; and
(b) The designation of any amount to be credited to the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145,
 to the person each year following a year in which the exemption
was allowed for that person. The form must be designed to
facilitate its return by mail by the person claiming the exemption.
If so requested by the person claiming the exemption, the county
assessor may provide the form to the person by electronic means
in lieu of by mail.
4. Before allowing any exemption pursuant to the provisions
of this section, the Department shall require proof that the person
is a Nevada Gold Star Spouse. For this purpose, the Department
shall require the person to produce:
(a) A DD Form 1300, “Report of Casualty,” or its succeeding
form, issued by the United States Department of Defense that
identifies the member of the Armed Forces to whom the person
was married and indicates that the member:
(1) Died under any of the circumstances described in 10
U.S.C. § 1126(a); and
-
*AB243_R2*

– 6 –
(2) Listed Nevada as his or her home of record; and
(b) Documentation that the person was married to the member.
5. The allowance of a tax exemption to a person under this
section does not affect the eligibility of that person for an
exemption under NRS 371.103 or 371.104 based on the person’s
own service in the Armed Forces of the United States, if
applicable.
6. If any person files a false affidavit or produces false proof
to the Department and, as a result of the false affidavit or false
proof, the person is allowed a tax exemption to which the person is
not entitled, the person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
7. The monetary amount in subsection 1 must be adjusted for
each fiscal year by adding to the amount the product of the
amount multiplied by the percentage increase in the consumer
price inflation index from December 2003 to the December
preceding the fiscal year for which the adjustment is calculated.
8. For the purposes of this section:
(a) “Consumer price inflation index” means the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as
published by the United States Department of Labor or, if that
index ceases to be published by the United States Department of
Labor, the published index selected by the Department of Taxation
pursuant to subsection 11 of NRS 361.091.
(b) “Nevada Gold Star Spouse” means the surviving spouse of
a member of the Armed Forces of the United States who:
(1) Died under any of the circumstances described in 10
U.S.C. § 1126(a); and
(2) At the time of his or her death was a resident of this
State.
(c) “Surviving spouse” includes a surviving domestic partner
as set forth in NRS 122A.200.
Sec. 5. NRS 371.1035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.1035 1. Any person who qualifies for an exemption
pursuant to NRS 371.103 or 371.104 or section 4 of this act may, in
lieu of claiming the exemption:
(a) Pay to the Department all or any portion of the amount by
which the tax would be reduced if the person claimed the
exemption; and
(b) Direct the Department to deposit that amount for credit to
the Gift Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the
Gift Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145.
2. Any person who wishes to waive his or her exemption
pursuant to this section shall designate the amount to be credited to
a Gift Account on a form provided by the Department.
-
*AB243_R2*

– 7 –
3. The Department shall deposit any money received pursuant
to this section with the State Treasurer for credit to the Gift Account
for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift Account for
the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established pursuant to NRS
417.145. The State Treasurer shall not accept more than a total of
$2,000,000 for credit to a Gift Account pursuant to this section and
NRS 361.0905 during any fiscal year.
Sec. 6. NRS 371.105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.105 Claims pursuant to NRS 371.101, 371.102, 371.103 or
371.104 or section 4 of this act for tax exemption on the
governmental services tax and designations of any amount to be
credited to the Gift Account for the Veterans Home in Southern
Nevada or the Gift Account for the Veterans Home in Northern
Nevada pursuant to NRS 371.1035 must be filed annually at any
time on or before the date when payment of the tax is due. All
exemptions provided for in this section must not be in an amount
which gives the taxpayer a total exemption greater than that to
which the taxpayer is entitled during any fiscal year.
Sec. 7. NRS 371.106 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.106 1. Whenever any vehicle ceases to be exempt from
taxation under NRS 371.101, 371.102, 371.103 or 371.104 or
section 4 of this act because the owner no longer meets the
requirements for the exemption provided in those sections, its owner
shall immediately notify the Department of the fact.
2. If a person fails to notify the Department as required by
subsection 1 and as a result of such failure is allowed a tax
exemption to which he or she is not entitled, there shall be added to
and collected with the tax otherwise due a penalty equal to double
the amount of the tax. If the person’s failure is fraudulent and results
in his or her receiving a tax exemption to which he or she is not
entitled, the person is also guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
H
-
*AB243_R2*